Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-408 Formal testacy
proceedings; will construction; effect of final order in another jurisdiction.
A final order of a court of another state determining testacy, the validity or
construction of a will, made in a proceeding involving notice to and an
opportunity for contest by all interested persons must be accepted as
determinative by the courts of this State if it includes, or is based upon, a
finding that the decedent was domiciled at the decedent's death in the state
where the order was made. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next